Maine, session 132, LD1318.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3110, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. FF, §1, is
amended to read:
A. Collecting and analyzing relevant data, including but not limited to systematically
collecting and maintaining data on the immigration status of individuals served or
supported by the activities of the Office of New Americans and collecting and
analyzing data on the outcomes for individuals seeking asylum, including the status
and resolution of asylum claims, in order to understand immigration trends and support
service delivery;